de: Form des Kunstköders: Boilie; Grundfutter; Liquid; Paste; Pellet; Pop-Up; Pulver; Weichplastik; Spinner; Wafter; Sonstige
nb: Kunstig agnform: Boilie; Grunnfôr; Væske; Pasta; Pellets; Pop-up; Pulver; Mykplast; Spinner; Wafter; Annet
ro-RO: Formă de momeală artificială: Boilies; Nadă; Lichid; Pastă; Pelete; Pop-up; Pudră; Plastic moale; Linguriță rotativă; Wafter; Altele
da: Formen på kunstigt agn: Boilie; Forfoder; Væske; Pasta; Pille; Pop op; Pulver; Blød plastik; Spinner; Wafter; Andet
th: รูปแบบเหยื่อปลอม: บอยลี่; กราวด์เบต; ของเหลว; เพสต์; เหยื่อเม็ด; ป๊อปอัพ; ผง; พลาสติกนิ่ม; สปินเนอร์; วอฟเตอร์; อื่นๆ
ko: 인공 미끼 형태: 보일리; 그라운드베이트; 액상; 페이스트; 펠릿; 팝업; 파우더; 소프트 플라스틱; 스피너; 와프터; 기타
zh-TW: 人工餌料形式: 麵團塊 (Boilie); 誘餌粉; 液體; 膏狀; 顆粒; 浮水餌 (Pop-up); 粉狀; 軟塑膠; 亮片旋轉餌 (Spinner); 懸浮餌 (Wafter); 其他
zh-CN: 人造饵料形式: 煮饵; 打窝饵; 液体; 膏状; 颗粒; 悬浮饵; 粉末; 软塑饵; 旋转亮片; 临界浮水饵; 其他
pt-PT: Forma do isco artificial: Boilie; Engodo; Líquido; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Pó; Plástico mole; Spinner; Wafter; Outros
bg-BG: Форма на изкуствена стръв: Протеиново топче; Захранка; Течност; Паста; Пелета; Pop-up; Прах; Силиконова примамка; Въртяща се блесна; Уафтър (Wafter); Друго
es: Forma de cebo artificial: Boilie; Cebo de fondo; Líquido; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Polvo; Plástico blando; Spinner; Wafter; Otra
pt-BR: Forma da isca artificial: Boilie; Ceva; Líquido; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Pó; Plástico flexível; Spinner; Wafter; Outro
fr: Forme d'appât artificiel: Bouillette; Amorce; Liquide; Pâte; Pellet; Pop-up; Poudre; Plastique souple; Cuiller; Wafter; Autre
sv: Konstgjord betesform: Boilie; Mäsk; Flytande; Pasta; Pellets; Popup; Pulver; Mjukplast; Spinnare; Wafter; Annat
pl: Forma sztucznej przynęty: Kulka proteinowa; Zanęta; Płyn; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Proszek; Guma (miękki plastik); Błystka obrotowa; Wafters; Inne
ja: 人工餌の形状: ボイリー; グラウンドベイト; リキッド; ペースト; ペレット; ポップアップ; パウダー; ソフトプラスチック; スピナー; ワフター; その他
lt-LT: Dirbtinė masalo forma: Baltyminis kukulis; Jaukas; Skystas; Pasta; Granulė; Plaukiantis (Pop-up); Milteliai; Minkštas plastikas; Sukriukė; Subalansuotas masalas (Wafter); Kita
cs: Tvar umělé nástrahy: Boilie; Krmítková směs; Tekutá; Pasta; Peleta; Pop-up; Prášek; Měkčený plast; Třpytka; Wafter; Ostatní
vi: Hình dạng mồi nhân tạo: Mồi luộc (Boilie); Mồi xả; Dạng lỏng; Dạng sệt; Dạng viên; Mồi nổi (Pop-up); Dạng bột; Nhựa mềm; Mồi quay; Mồi lửng (Wafter); Khác
ru: Форма искусственной приманки: Бойл; Прикормка; Жидкая; Паста; Пеллетс; Плавающий бойл; Порошок; Силикон; Блесна; Вафтерс; Другое
hr-HR: Oblik umjetnog mamca: Boila; Hrana za primamljivanje; Tekućina; Pasta; Pelet; Pop-up; Prah; Meka plastika; Leptir (spinner); Wafter; Ostalo
hu: Műcsali formája: Bojli; Etetőanyag; Folyékony; Paszta; Pellet; Pop-up; Por; Lágy műanyag; Körforgó; Wafter; Egyéb
sk-SK: Umelá forma návnady: Boilies; Vnadiaca zmes; Tekutina; Pasta; Pelety; Pop-up; Prášok; Mäkký plast; Rotačka; Wafters; Iné
el: Μορφή τεχνητού δολώματος: Boilie; Μαλάγρα; Υγρό; Πάστα; Πέλετ; Pop-up; Σκόνη; Μαλακό πλαστικό; Spinner; Wafter; Άλλο
en: Artificial bait form: Boilie; Groundbait; Liquid; Paste; Pellet; Pop-up; Powder; Soft plastic; Spinner; Wafter; Other
it: Forma di esca artificiale: Boilie; Pastura; Liquido; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Polvere; Plastica morbida; Cucchiaino rotante; Wafter; Altro
fi: Keinotekoisen syötin muoto: Boilie; Groundbait; Liquid; Paste; Pellet; Pop-up; Powder; Soft plastic; Spinner; Wafter; Muu
nl: Kunstaas vorm: Boilie; Grondvoer; Vloeistof; Pasta; Pellet; Pop-up; Poeder; Zacht plastic; Spinner; Wafter; Overige
tr: Yapay yem formu: Boilie; Dip yemi; Sıvı; Macun; Pelet; Pop-up; Toz; Yumuşak plastik; Döner kaşık; Wafter; Diğer
sl-SI: Oblika umetne vabe: Bojli; Talna vaba; Tekočina; Pasta; Pelet; Pop-up; Prah; Mehka plastika; Vrtljivka; Wafter; Drugo